Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5865.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 4-1-1 and 4-1-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 4-1 entitled "Cruelty
to Animals" are hereby amended to read as follows:
4-1-1. Definitions — Responsibility for agents and employees.
(a) In this chapter and in §§ 4-4-9, 4-4-10, and 23-19-8:
(1) “Animal” and “animals” means every living creature except a human being.
(2) "Cosmetic" means any:
(i) Articles intended to be rubbed, poured, sprinkled, or sprayed on, introduced into, or
otherwise applied to the human body or any part thereof for cleansing, beautifying, promoting
attractiveness, or altering the appearance; and
(ii) Articles intended for use as a component of any such articles; except that such term
shall not include soap.
(3) "Cosmetic animal testing" means the internal or external application or exposure of any
cosmetic product, or any cosmetic ingredient or non-functional constituent, to the skin, eyes, or
other body part (organ or extremity) of a live non-human vertebrate for the purpose of evaluating
the safety or efficacy of a cosmetic product or a cosmetic ingredient or non-functional constituent
for the use in a cosmetic product.
(4) "Cosmetic product" means a finished cosmetic the manufacture of which has been
completed.
(2)(5) “Licensed graduate veterinarian” or “veterinarian” means a person licensed to

engage in the practice of veterinary medicine, surgery, and dentistry in this state who is a graduate
of an accredited veterinary medical, surgical, and dental school or college of a standard recognized
by the Rhode Island Veterinary Medical Association.
(3)(6) “Owner,” “person,” and “whoever” means corporations as well as individuals.
(4)(7) “Guardian” shall mean a person(s) having the same rights and responsibilities of an
owner, and both terms shall be used interchangeably. A guardian shall also mean a person who
possesses, has title to or an interest in, harbors, or has control, custody, or possession of an animal
and who is responsible for an animal’s safety and well-being.
(8) "Cosmetic ingredient" means any single chemical entity or mixture used as a
component of a cosmetic product as defined by 21 C.F.R. 700.3.
(9) "Manufacturer" means any entity whose name appears on the label of a cosmetic
product pursuant to the requirements of 21 C.F.R. 701.12.
(10) "Non-functional constituent" means any incidental ingredient as defined by 21 C.F.R.
701.3.
(11) "Supplier" means any entity that supplies, directly or through a third party, any
ingredient used in the formulation of a cosmetic product.
(5)(12) Except for livestock as defined in § 4-26-3(6), “adequate living conditions” shall
mean a sanitary environment that is dry and free of accumulated feces and free of debris and
garbage that may clutter the environment, pose a danger, or entangle the animal. The environment
in which the animal is kept must be consistent with federal regulatory requirements, where
applicable, or generally recognized professional standards, where applicable, or otherwise be of
sufficient size so as not to inhibit comfortable rest, normal posture, or range of movement, and
suitable to maintain the animal in a good state of health. “Adequate living conditions” for livestock
as defined in § 4-26-3(6) shall mean best management practices established, no later than July 1,
2014, by the Rhode Island livestock welfare and care standards advisory council.
(6)(13) Except for livestock as defined in § 4-26-3, “hazardous accumulation of animals”
means the accumulation of a large number of animals, to a point where the owner, possessor, or
person having the charge of custody of the aforementioned animals fails to or is unable to provide
“adequate living conditions” as defined herein, resulting in harm or danger to the health and
wellbeing of the animals.
(b) The knowledge and acts of agents of and persons employed by corporations in regard
to animals transported, owned or employed by or in the custody of that corporation are held to be
the acts and knowledge of that corporation.
4-1-3. Unnecessary cruelty.
LC001884 - Page 2 of 6

(a) Every owner, possessor, or person having the charge or custody of any animal, who
cruelly drives or works that animal when unfit for labor, or cruelly abandons that animal, or who
carries that animal or who fails to provide that animal with adequate living conditions as defined
in § 4-1-1, or who engages in the hazardous accumulation of animals as defined in § 4-1-1, or
causes that animal, to be carried, in or upon any vehicle or otherwise, in a cruel or inhuman manner;
or willfully, intentionally, maliciously, recklessly, and/or knowingly authorizes or permits that
animal to be subjected to unnecessary torture, suffering, or cruelty of any kind; or who places, or
causes to have placed, on any animal any substance that may produce irritation or pain or that is
declared a hazardous substance by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration or by the state
department of health, shall be punished for each offense in the manner provided in § 4-1-2. If the
offense described in this section results in the death of the animal, the person shall be punished in
the manner provided in § 4-1-5. If any owner, possessor, or person having the charge or custody of
any animal is found guilty of or pleads nolo contendere to a violation of this section and said
violation involves the hazardous accumulation of animals, the court shall, in imposing a penalty
under this section, take into account whether the defendant’s conduct could be considered to be the
result of a mental health disorder as defined in § 27-38.2-2.
(b) The substances proscribed by subsection (a) do not include any drug having curative
and therapeutic effect for disease in animals and that is prepared and intended for veterinary use.
(c) University, college, or hospital research facilities licensed and/or inspected by the U.S.
Department of Agriculture or the U.S. Public Health Service of the Department of Health and
Human Services shall be exempt from the provisions of subsection (a) provided that they are in
good standing with the federal agency responsible for licensing or assurance of the facility.
(d)(1) No manufacturer shall sell or offer for sale in the state any cosmetic that was
developed or manufactured using cosmetic animal testing, if the testing was conducted or
contracted by the manufacturer or any supplier of the manufacturer on or after January 1, 2026.
(2) The prohibitions of subsection (d)(1) of this section do not apply to cosmetics
developed or manufactured using cosmetic animal testing if:
(i) Such testing is requested, conducted, or required by a federal or state regulatory
authority and:
(A) There is no non-animal alternative method or strategy recognized by any federal
agency or the organization for economic cooperation and development for the relevant safety
endpoints for the cosmetic ingredient or non-functional constituent;
(B) The cosmetic ingredient or non-functional constituent poses a risk of causing a specific
human health problem that is substantiated and the need to conduct cosmetic animal testing is
LC001884 - Page 3 of 6

justified and supported by a detailed research protocol proposed as the basis for the evaluation of
the cosmetic ingredient, or non-functional constituent; and
(C) The cosmetic ingredient or non-functional constituent is in wide use and, in the case of
a cosmetic ingredient, cannot be replaced by another ingredient capable of performing a similar
function;
(ii) Such testing is conducted outside the United States to comply with a requirement of a
foreign regulatory authority; provided that, no evidence derived from such testing is relied upon to
substantiate the safety of the cosmetic in Rhode Island;
(iii) Such testing is conducted on a product or ingredient subject to the requirements of
subchapter V of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. § 351 et seq.; or
(iv) Such testing is conducted for a cosmetic ingredient intended to be used in a product
that is not a cosmetic product and conducted pursuant to a requirement of a federal, state, or foreign
regulatory authority as long as no evidence derived from animal testing conducted after the
effective date of this subsection is relied upon to substantiate the safety of a cosmetic sold in the
state by a manufacturer, unless all of the following apply:
(A) There is no non-animal alternative method or strategy recognized by any federal or
state agency or the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development for the relevant
safety endpoints for such ingredient;
(B) There is documented evidence of the non-cosmetic intent of the test; and
(C) There is a history of use of the ingredient outside of cosmetics at least one year prior
to the manufacturer's reliance on such data.
(3) The provisions of subsection (d) of this section shall not apply to:
(i) A cosmetic product if the cosmetic in its final form was tested on animals before January
1, 2025 even if the cosmetic is manufactured on or after that date; provided that, no new animal
testing in violation subsection (d) of this section occurs after January 1, 2026;
(ii) An ingredient in a cosmetic if the cosmetic ingredient was tested on animals before
January 1, 2025 even if the ingredient is manufactured on or after that date; provided that, no new
animal testing in violation of subsection (d) of this section occurs after January 1, 2026; or
(iii) A manufacturer reviewing, assessing, or retaining evidence from a cosmetic animal
test.
(4) No political subdivision of the state may establish or continue any prohibition on or
relating to cosmetic animal testing, as defined in this section, that is not identical to the prohibitions
set forth in this section.
(5) Any person or manufacturer that violates subsection (d)(1) of this section shall be
LC001884 - Page 4 of 6

subject to a penalty of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense. If the violation is of a
continuing nature, each day during which it continues constitutes an additional, separate, and
distinct offense.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001884
========
LC001884 - Page 5 of 6